Idaho, session 2025, S1036.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the Legislature to
protect Idaho adults and children from the adverse effects of experimental
gene therapy and biologic products utilized as immunizations. By enact-
ing this section, named in honor of Doug Cameron, the Legislature seeks to
establish a moratorium on gene therapy immunizations to ensure the safety
and well-being of all Idahoans. Doug Cameron, an Idaho rancher in excellent
health, was severely injured immediately after receiving a genetic immu-
nization encouraged by his employer. The injury left him disabled from the
waist down, unable to walk, and confined to a wheelchair. His experience
highlights the urgent need for caution, transparency, and rigorous over-
sight in the deployment of these treatments.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 48, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-4810, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-4810. MORATORIUM ON CERTAIN USE OF HUMAN GENE THERAPY PRODUCTS. (1)
This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Doug Cameron Act."
(2) The legislature finds that, in order to protect the health and
safety of Idaho citizens, a moratorium on the administration of human gene
therapy products in certain cases is necessary. No person in Idaho shall
administer, by any route or modality, any human gene therapy product for any
infectious disease indication, regardless of whether such administration is
termed an immunization, vaccine, or any other term.
(3) For the purpose of this section, "human gene therapy product" means
all products that mediate their effects by transcription or translation of
transferred genetic material or by specifically altering human genetic se-
quences. Human gene therapy products include but are not limited to:
(a) Nucleic acids, such as plasmids and in vitro transcribed ribonu-
cleic acid (RNA);
(b) Genetically modified microorganisms, such as viruses, bacteria,
and fungi;
(c) Engineered site-specific nucleases used for human genome editing;
and
(d) Ex vivo genetically modified human cells.


(4) The provisions of this section shall not apply to human gene therapy
products utilized for treatment or therapy of cancer or genetic disorders.
(5) The moratorium described in this section shall remain in effect un-
til July 1, 2035, subject to legislative review of available safety data.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.